en: White rice cooked with chicken
fr: Riz blanc cuit au poulet
hr: Bijela riža kuhana s piletinom
lt: Virti balti ryžiai su vištiena

en: White rice cooked with vegetables and meat
fr: Riz blanc cuit avec légumes et viande
hr: Bijela riža kuhana s povrćem i mesom
lt: Virti balti ryžiai su daržovėmis ir mėsa

en: Unsalted cooked rice
fr: Riz blanc cuit non salé
hr: Neslana kuhana riža
lt: Virti balti ryžiai be druskos

en: Unsalted cooked wild rice
fr: Riz sauvage cuit non salé
hr: Neslana kuhana divlja riža
lt: Virti laukiniai ryžiai be druskos

en: Canned cereals
de: Getreide in Dosen, Getreidekonserve
es: Cereales en conserva
fi: purkitetut viljat
fr: Céréales en conserve
hr: Konzervirane žitarice
hu: Gabonakonzervek
it: Cereali in scatola
lt: Konservuoti grūdai
nl: Conservengranen, Graan in pot
pt: Cereais em lata

en: Canned corn
bg: Консервирана царевица
de: Dosenmais, Maiskonserve
es: Maíz en conserva
fi: purkitettu maissi
fr: Maïs en conserve
hr: Konzervirani kukuruz
hu: Kukorica konzerv
it: Mais in scatola
lt: Konservuoti kukurūzai
nl: Maïs in conserven, Maïs in blik/pot
pl: Kukurydza w puszce
pt: Milho em lata
ru: Консервированая кукуруза

en: Canned sweet corn
bg: Консервирана сладка царевица
de: Dosenzuckermais, Zuckermaiskonserve
es: Maíz dulce en conserva
fi: purkitettu makea maissi
fr: Maïs doux en conserve, Maïs doux appertisé, Maïs doux en conserve égoutté
hr: Konzervirani kukuruz šećerac
it: Mais dolce in scatola
lt: Konservuoti saldieji kukurūzai
nl: Suikermaïs in blik/pot
pt: Milhos doces em lata

en: Brick sheets, Baked filo pastry sheets without fat, Baked phyllo pastry sheets without fat
fr: Feuilles de brick, Feuilles de brick cuite à sec sans matière grasse
hr: Limovi od opeke
nl: Brick vellen

en: Puff pastry molds for vol-au-vent
fr: Moules feuilletés pour vol-au-vent ou bouchées la reine

en: Chips and fries
ca: Patates fregides i similars
de: Chips und Pommes Frites
fi: Lastut ja ranskanperunat
fr: Chips et frites
he: צ׳יפס ומטוגנים
hr: Čips i pomfrit
hu: Chips és krumpli
it: Patatine e fritti
lt: Traškučiai ir bulvytės
nl: Chips en patat, Chips en friet
pl: Chipsy i frytki, Czipsy i frytki
ru: Чипсы и картофель фри
zh: 薯片和薯条

en: Crisps
bg: Чипс
ca: Patates xips
de: Chips
es: Chips fritos, papas fritas
fi: Lastut, Sipsit
fr: Chips
hr: čips
hu: Csipszek
it: Patatine sottili, Patatine imbustate, Patatine croccanti
lt: Traškučiai, Čipsai
nl: Chips
pl: Chipsy, Czipsy
ru: Чипсы
th: มันฝรั่งทอด
zh: 薯片

en: Extruded protein crisps
fr: Chips de protéines extrudées

en: Vegetable crisps
fr: Chips de légumes

en: Buckwheat crisps
fr: Chips de sarrasin

en: Chickpea crisps
fr: Chips de pois chiches
hr: Čips od slanutka
lt: Avinžirnių traškučiai

en: Roasted peas
lt: Skrudinti žirneliai

en: Salty roasted peas
fr: Pois grillés salés
hr: Slani pečeni grašak
lt: Sūdyti skrudinti žirneliai

en: Salty roasted chickpeas
fr: Pois chiches grillés salés
hr: Slani pečeni slanutak
lt: Sūdyti skrudinti avinžirniai

en: Tapas
xx: Tapas
de: Tapas
es: Tapas
fi: Tapas
fr: Tapas
hr: Tapas
it: Tapas
nl: Tapas

en: Arancini
xx: Arancini
de: Arancini
es: Arancini
fr: Arancini
hr: Arancini
it: Arancini
ja: アランチーニ
nl: Arancini
pt: Arancini